Utah statutes.
78B-4-402.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Inherent risks of skiing" means those dangers or conditions which are an integral part of the sport of recreational, competitive, or professional skiing, including, but not limited to:

(a)  changing weather conditions;

(b)  snow or ice conditions as they exist or may change, such as hard pack, powder, packed powder, wind pack, corn, crust, slush, cut-up snow, or machine-made snow;

(c)  surface or subsurface conditions such as bare spots, forest growth, rocks, stumps, streambeds, cliffs, trees, and other natural objects;

(d)  variations or steepness in terrain, whether natural or as a result of slope design, snowmaking or grooming operations, and other terrain modifications such as terrain parks, and terrain features such as jumps, rails, fun boxes, and all other constructed and natural features such as half pipes, quarter pipes, or freestyle-bump terrain;

(e)  impact with lift towers and other structures and their components such as signs, posts, fences or enclosures, hydrants, or water pipes;

(f)  collisions with other skiers;

(g)  participation in, or practicing or training for, competitions or special events; and

(h)  the failure of a skier to ski within the skier's own ability.

(2)  "Injury" means any personal injury or property damage or loss.

(3)  "Skier" means any person present in a ski area for the purpose of engaging in the sport of skiing, nordic, freestyle, or other types of ski jumping, using skis, sled, tube, snowboard, or any other device.

(4)  "Ski area" means any area designated by a ski area operator to be used for skiing, nordic, freestyle, or other type of ski jumping, and snowboarding.

(5)  "Ski area operator" means those persons, and their agents, officers, employees or representatives, who operate a ski area.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

